Maryland, session 2025, SB0168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
1–701.
(a) (7) “Overburdened community” means any census tract for which three or
more of the following environmental health indicators are above the 75th percentile
statewide:
(i) Particulate matter (PM) 2.5;
(ii) Ozone;
(iii) National Air Toxics Assessment (NATA) diesel PM;
(iv) NATA cancer risk;
(v) NATA respiratory hazard index;
(vi) Traffic proximity;
(vii) Lead paint indicator;
(viii) National Priorities List Superfund site proximity;
(ix) Risk Management Plan facility proximity;
(x) Hazardous waste proximity;
(xi) Wastewater discharge indicator;
(xii) Proximity to a Concentrated Animal Feeding Operation (CAFO);
(xiii) Percent of the population lacking broadband coverage;
(xiv) Asthma emergency room discharges;
(xv) Myocardial infarction discharges;
(xvi) Low–birth–weight infants;
(xvii) Proximity to emitting power plants;
(xviii) Proximity to a Toxic Release Inventory (TRI) facility;

SENATE BILL 168 3
(xix) Proximity to a brownfields site;
(xx) Proximity to mining operations; and
(xxi) Proximity to a hazardous waste landfill.
5–1101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(1) “Baltimore County tributary dredged material” means earth, rock, soil,
waste matter, muck, or other materials excavated or dredged from an approved dredging
project in any of the Baltimore County tributaries of the Chesapeake Bay.
(2) “Baltimore Harbor” means the waterway which consists of the tidal
portions of Patapsco River and its tributaries lying westward of a line extending from Rock
Point in Anne Arundel County to North Point in Baltimore County.
(3) “Beneficial use of dredged material” means any of the following uses of
dredged material from the Chesapeake Bay and its tributary waters placed into waters or
onto bottomland of the Chesapeake Bay or its tidal tributaries, including Baltimore Harbor:
(i) The restoration of underwater grasses;
(ii) The restoration of islands;
(iii) The stabilization of eroding shorelines;
(iv) The creation or restoration of wetlands; and
(v) The creation, restoration, or enhancement of fish or shellfish
habitats.
(4) “CONFINED AQUATIC DISPOSAL CELL” MEANS AN UNDERWATER
CONTAINMENT STRUCTURE THAT STORES CONTAMINATED SEDIMENTS IN A
DEPRESSION IN THE BOTTOM OF A BODY OF WATER A DREDGED MATERIAL
MANAGEMENT OPTION WHERE A DEPRESSION OR CELL IS EXCAVATED INTO THE
BOTTOM OF A BODY OF WATER, ANY SAND EXCAVATED IS REUSED IN A BENEFICIAL
MANNER, AND THE DEPRESSION OR CELL IS FILLED IN WITH DREDGED MATERIALS,
INCLUDING DREDGED MATERIALS FROM BALTIMORE HARBOR.
[(4)] (5) “Deep trough” means any region that:
(i) Is south of the Chesapeake Bay Bridge and north of a line
extending westerly from Bloody Point; and

SENATE BILL 168
(ii) Has a depth that exceeds 60 feet.
[(5)] (6) “Dredged material” means earth, sand, silt, sediment, shell, rock,
soil, waste matter, or other material excavated or dredged from the Chesapeake Bay and
its tributary waters.
[(6)] (7) “Innovative reuse” includes the use of dredged material in the
development or manufacturing of commercial, industrial, horticultural, agricultural, or
other products.
(8) “OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(7)] (9) (8) “Redeposit” means to dump, scatter, pour, or otherwise deposit
dredged material.
[(8)] (10) (9) (i) “Sewage sludge” means the accumulated semiliquid
suspension of settled solids, or dried residue of these solids, that is deposited from sewage
in wastewater treatment plant tanks or basins.
(ii) “Sewage sludge” includes raw untreated sewage disposed from
the Back River Sewage Treatment Plant.
5–1102.
(a) (1) [A] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A person
may not redeposit in an unconfined manner dredged material from Baltimore Harbor into
or onto any portion of the water or bottomland of the Chesapeake Bay or of the tidewater
portions of any of the Chesapeake Bay’s tributaries outside of Baltimore Harbor.
(2) [However, the] THE dredged material may be redeposited in contained
areas approved by the Department.
(b) A person may not redeposit in an unconfined manner Baltimore County
tributary dredged material into or onto any portion of the water or bottomland of the
Chesapeake Bay or of the tidewater portions of any of the Chesapeake Bay’s tributaries
within 5 miles of the Hart–Miller–Pleasure Island chain in Baltimore County.
(c) (1) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section AND SUBJECT TO
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, a person may not redeposit in an unconfined
manner dredged material into or onto any portion of the water or bottomland of the
Chesapeake Bay or of the tidewater portion of any of the Chesapeake Bay’s tributaries
except when used for a beneficial use project undertaken in accordance with State and
federal laws.

SENATE BILL 168 5
(2) [However, the] THE dredged material may be redeposited in contained
areas approved by the Department.
(d) (1) Beginning October 1, 2001, subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection,
and in accordance with State and federal law, a person may redeposit up to 7.4 million cubic
yards of dredged material into or onto any portion of the water, bottomland, or the
tidewater portions of the Chesapeake Bay collectively known as Pooles Island, including
G–West and Site 92.
(2) The redeposit of dredged material authorized under this subsection
may not occur after the sooner of:
(i) December 31, 2010; or
(ii) The initiation of the placement of dredged material in any site or
sites approved pursuant to the process established in § 5–1104.2(d)(1) of this subtitle if the
total capacity of the approved site or sites, when combined with the approved capacity of
existing placement sites identified in the October 1, 2000 report to the Maryland General
Assembly regarding the Governor’s Strategic Plan for Dredged Material Management,
provide 20 years of placement capacity for dredged material.
(e) A person may not dump, deposit, scatter, or release sewage sludge by any
means, including discharge from a sewer or pipe, into or onto any portion of the water or
bottomland of the Chesapeake Bay or of the tidewater portions of any of the Chesapeake
Bay’s tributaries within 5 miles of the Hart–Miller–Pleasure Island chain in Baltimore
County.
(f) A person may not redeposit dredged material or other material excavated or
dredged from the Chesapeake Bay or its tidal tributaries into or onto the area of the
bottomlands or waters of the Chesapeake Bay known as the deep trough.
(G) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT PROCESS OR MAKE ANY
RECOMMENDATION TO THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS REGARDING AN
APPLICATION FOR THE ALTERATION OF ANY TIDAL WETLAND OR WATERS OF THE
STATE SUBMITTED FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONSTRUCTING A CONFINED AQUATIC
DISPOSAL CELL WITHIN 5 MILES OF A RESIDENTIAL OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY
FROM JUNE 1, 2025, THROUGH MAY 31, 2029, BOTH INCLUSIVE.
(2) THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS MAY NOT APPROVE AN
APPLICATION FOR THE ALTERATION OF ANY TIDAL WETLAND OR WATERS OF THE
STATE SUBMITTED FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONSTRUCTING A CONFINED AQUATIC
DISPOSAL CELL WITHIN 5 MILES OF A RESIDENTIAL OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY
FROM JUNE 1, 2025, THROUGH MAY 31, 2029, BOTH INCLUSIVE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 4 years and, at the end of May

SENATE BILL 168
31, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.